District of Columbia statutes.
1-611.55

Meetings and hearings.

(a)

The Commission shall meet as frequently as the proper and efficient discharge of its duties may require. A majority of the voting members shall constitute a quorum. The Commission may act by an affirmative vote of a majority of its voting members.

(b)

Other than executive sessions to consider privileged matters, the meetings of the Commission shall be open to the public. The discussion of compensation shall not be a privileged matter.

(c)

An executive meeting may be convened by a vote of a majority of the voting members of the Commission, upon good cause shown.

(d)

The Commission shall hold at least 2 public hearings to take public testimony on any proposed compensation changes, including from compensation experts from the public and private sectors.

(e)

The Commission shall maintain minutes of the meetings.

Mar 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1155
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-295, § 2(b), 54 DCR 1092